Wisconsin, session 2025, SB918.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the State Public Defender and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of this bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.SB918,11Section 1. 977.03 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB918,2,52977.03 (1) The board may remove the state public defender pursuant to the 3procedure under s. 977.05 (2). The board may enter into contracts with federal 4governmental agencies and local public defender organizations for the provision of 5legal services under this chapter.Note: This Section strikes a reference to an obsolete procedure for removing a state public defender.SB918,26Section 2. 977.05 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB918,2,137977.05 (1) Appointment. The board shall appoint a state public defender, 8who shall be a member of the State Bar of Wisconsin. The state public defender 9shall serve for a period of 5 years and shall continue until a successor is appointed, 10except that at the conclusion of the 5-year term of the state public defender in office 11as of July 1, 1980, the state public defender shall be appointed to serve at the 12pleasure of the board. He or she shall devote full time to the performance of duties 13as state public defender.Note: This Section eliminates an obsolete reference to the public defender’s term of office.SB918,314Section 3. 977.05 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB918,2,1815977.05 (2) Removal. During a 5-year term commencing prior to July 1, 1980, 16the state public defender may be discharged only for cause by the board after a 17public hearing. If the state public defender is serving at the pleasure of the board, 18he or she is subject to removal under s. 17.07.Note: This Section eliminates an obsolete reference to the public defender’s term of office.SB918,2,1919